District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.71

Repealed

Failure to report accident; penalty.

Repealed.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 138, ch. 222, § 71
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155,§ 14(e), 29 DCR 3491
1981 Ed., § 40-471.
1973 Ed., § 40-487.